District of Columbia statutes.
50-2351

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Autonomous vehicle” means a vehicle capable of navigating District roadways and interpreting traffic-control devices without a driver actively operating any of the vehicle’s control systems. The term “autonomous vehicle” excludes a motor vehicle enabled with active safety systems or driver- assistance systems, including systems to provide electronic blind-spot assistance, crash avoidance, emergency braking, parking assistance, adaptive cruise control, lane-keep assistance, lane-departure warning, or traffic-jam and queuing assistance, unless the system alone or in combination with other systems enables the vehicle on which the technology is installed to drive without active control or monitoring by a human operator.

(2)

“Driver” means a human operator of a motor vehicle with a valid driver’s license.

(3)

“Public roadway” means a street, road, or public thoroughfare that allows motor vehicles.

(4)

“Traffic control device” means a traffic signal, traffic sign, electronic traffic sign, pavement marking, or other sign, device, or apparatus designed and installed to direct moving traffic.

History

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-278, § 2, 60 DCR 2119